Utah statutes.
77-6-1.   Officers subject to removal.

All justices of the peace and all officers of any city, county or other political subdivision of this state not liable to impeachment shall be subject to removal as provided in this chapter for high crimes and misdemeanors or malfeasance in office.



Enacted by Chapter 15, 1980 General Session

